Hawaii statutes.
§712-1273 Suit to have precedence.
The suit when brought shall have precedence over all cases, excepting criminal
proceedings, election contests, and hearings on injunctions, and in the suit
evidence of the general reputation of the building, premises, place, or
persons, and of the use or threat of violence shall be admissible for the
purpose of proving the existence of the nuisance. [L 1979, c 181, pt of §2; am
L 1996, c 246, §4; am L 1998, c 286, §3; am L 2005, c 123, §5]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next